Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 2. Procedure for Probate

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Ungrateful Living: An Estate Planner's Nightmare — The Trial Attorney's Dream,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 401 (1989).

For case note, “STATUTES — Retroactive Application of the 1980 Wyoming Probate Code. Douglas v. Newell, 719 P.2d 971,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 555

(Wyo. 1986),” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 553 (1989).

§ 2-6-201.
Contents of petition; defect in jurisdictional statement inconsequential.

A petition for the probate of a will shall show:

The jurisdictional facts;

Whether the person named as executor consents to act, or renounces his right to letters testamentary;

The names, ages and residences of the heirs and devisees of the decedent, so far as known to the petitioner;

The probable value and character of the property of the estate;

The name of the person for whom letters testamentary are prayed.

No defect of form or in the statement of jurisdictional facts actually existing shall make void the probate of a will.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 2, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 4583; C.S. 1910, § 5411; C.S. 1920, § 6683; R.S. 1931, § 88-211; C.S. 1945, § 6-205; W.S. 1957, § 2-59; W.S. 1977, §

2-4-203

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Omission of heir not deemed jurisdictional. —

Fact that contestant was not named as an heir in the petition for probate, and no copy of notice of the time and place of probate was sent to her, was held not jurisdictional, and contestant had day in court with full opportunity to present claims for consideration. Lane's Estate, 50 Wyo. 119, 58 P.2d 415,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1936).

Cited in

Gaston v. Wagner (In re Estate of Meeker), 2017 WY 75, 397 P.3d 183,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

§ 2-6-202.
Failure of executor to petition; appointment of administrator.

If the person named in a will as executor, for thirty (30) days after he has knowledge of the death of the testator and that he is named as executor, fails to petition the proper court for probate of the will and that letters testamentary be issued to him, he may be held to have renounced his right to letters and the court may appoint any other competent person administrator unless good cause for delay is shown.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 2, § 6; R.S. 1899, § 4574; C.S. 1910, § 5412; C.S. 1920, § 6684; R.S. 1931, § 88-212; C.S. 1945, § 6-206; W.S. 1957, § 2-60; W.S. 1977, §

2-4-204

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Section applies to both foreign and domestic wills.

Rice v. Tilton, 13 Wyo. 420, 80 P. 828,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1905).

And failure to apply forfeits preference given persons named in foreign will. —

The preference as to letters of administration given by this section to nonresidents named as executors is forfeited by failing to apply for probate of a foreign will and for letters testamentary within the time fixed by this section. Rice v. Tilton, 13 Wyo. 420, 80 P. 828,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1905).

In which case appointment becomes matter of court's discretion. —

Where person named in will does not apply for letters of administration within time fixed by statute, he waives the right, and thereafter it is a matter of discretion of the court as to his appointment or appointment of some other person. Rice v. Tilton, 13 Wyo. 420, 80 P. 828,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1905).

Persons designated by the testator to be executors are not rendered incompetent by their delay, but simply lose their preference right, and it then becomes at least a matter for the exercise of sound discretion by the court; and, unless there is an abuse of the discretion by the judge of the court, his judgment should not be disturbed. Rice v. Tilton, 13 Wyo. 420, 80 P. 828,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1905).

Contest in another state may excuse delay. —

The fact of the application having been made in another state, and the probate of the will being there contested, is probably a sufficient showing of good cause for not applying to the court of this state up to the time of the final decision in that state. Rice v. Tilton, 13 Wyo. 420, 80 P. 828,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1905) (good cause for delay not shown).

But ignorance of local law and bad legal advice do not. —

The fact that the persons named as executors in the will of a nonresident were not familiar with the laws of this state, or that they were ill-advised by their out-of-state attorney, was not good cause for delay. Rice v. Tilton, 13 Wyo. 420, 80 P. 828,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1905).

Cited in

Gaston v. Wagner (In re Estate of Meeker), 2017 WY 75, 397 P.3d 183,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2017).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Loss of right to be appointed executor by delay in presenting will for probate or in seeking letters testamentary, 45 ALR2d 916.

§ 2-6-203.
Hearing upon petition; notice not required.

Upon the filing of a petition for probate of a will, the court or the clerk may hear it forthwith or at such time and place as the court or clerk may direct, with or without requiring notice, and upon proof of due execution of the will, admit the same to probate.

Notice is not required and there shall be no delay in the hearing, unless good cause appears.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-6-204.
Proof; self-proving will.

A will executed in compliance with W.S.

2-6-114

shall be probated without further proof.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-6-205.
Proof; wills not self-proving.

If the will is not self-proving, proof of a will may be made by the oral or written testimony of one or more of the subscribing witnesses to the will. If the testimony is in writing, it shall be substantially in the following form, executed and sworn to contemporaneously with the execution of the will or at any time thereafter, whether before or after the date of death of the testator:

In the District Court of Wyoming In and for County In the Matter of the Estate ofDeceasedState ofCounty Probate No. Testimony of Subscribing ss
Witness on Probate of Will I, , being first duly sworn, state: I reside in the County of , State of ; I knew the testator on the day of , (year), the date of the instrument, the original or exact reproduction of which is attached hereto, now shown to me, and purporting to be the last will and testament of the said ; I am one of the subscribing witnesses to said instrument; and on the said date of said instrument, I knew , the other subscribing witness; and said instrument was exhibited to me and to the other subscribing witness by the testator, who declared the same to be his last will and testament, and was signed by the testator at , in the County of , State of , on the date shown in said instrument, in the presence of myself and the other subscribing witness; and the other subscribing witness and I then and there, at the request of the testator, in the presence of said testator and in the presence of each other, subscribed our names thereto as witnesses. Name of witness Address Subscribed and sworn to before me this day of , (year). Notary Public in and for County of State of (SEAL)

Click to view

If it is desired to prove the execution of the will by deposition rather than by use of the affidavit form provided in subsection (a) of this section, upon application the clerk shall issue a commission to some officer authorized by the law of this state to take depositions, with the will annexed, and the officer taking the deposition shall exhibit it to the witness for identification, and, when identified by him, shall mark it as “Exhibit . . . . . ” and cause the witness to connect his identification with it as such exhibit. Before sending out the commission the clerk shall make and retain in his office a true copy of the will.

If all of the witnesses are deceased or otherwise not available, it is permissible to prove the will by the sworn testimony of two (2) credible disinterested witnesses that the signature to the will is in the handwriting of the person whose will it purports to be, and that the signatures of the witnesses are in the handwriting of the witnesses, or it may be proved by other sufficient evidence of the execution of the will.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1999, ch. 150, § 2.

Quoted

in

In re Estate of Altman, 650 P.2d 277,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 377

(Wyo. 1982).

§ 2-6-206.
Proof; holographic wills.

An holographic will may be proved the same as any other private writing.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Applied

in

Seeley v. Estate of Seeley, 627 P.2d 1357,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 335

(Wyo. 1981).

§ 2-6-207.
Proof; lost or destroyed will; court may restrain personal representatives pending disposition.

Whenever any will is lost or destroyed, the district court shall take proof of the execution and validity thereof to establish the same. All the testimony shall be reduced to writing and signed by the witnesses.

No will shall be proved as a lost or destroyed will unless it is proved to have been in existence at the time of death of the testator, or is shown to have been fraudulently destroyed in the lifetime of the testator, nor unless its provisions are clearly and distinctly proved by at least two (2) credible witnesses.

When a lost will is established, the provisions thereof shall be distinctly stated and certified by the judge, under his hand and the seal of the court, and the certificate shall be filed and recorded as other wills are filed and recorded, and letters testamentary or of administration with the will annexed, shall be issued thereon in the same manner as upon wills produced and duly proved.

If before or during the pendency of an application to prove a lost or destroyed will, letters of administration are granted on the estate of the testator or letters testamentary of any previous will of the testator are granted, the court may restrain the personal representatives so appointed from any acts or proceedings which would be injurious to the legatees or devisees claiming under the lost or destroyed will.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 4, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 4597; C.S. 1910, § 5435; C.S. 1920, § 6707; R.S. 1931, § 88-404; C.S. 1945, § 6-604; W.S. 1957, § 2-75; W.S. 1977, § 2-4-243; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Sufficiency of evidence. —

Evidence was sufficient to support the trial court's finding that petitioner, decedent's brother, utterly failed to present evidence, as required under § 2-6-207(a), to support a conclusion that a purported lost will was properly executed; the only testimony remotely concerning the validity of the purported lost will came from decedent's brother, and one other witness, who both testified, inter alia, that they saw the will and checked the signature page and recognized the decedent's signature. Cheek v. Zerbe (In re Estate of Cheek), 2002 WY 130, 53 P.3d 113,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 2002).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sufficiency of evidence of nonrevocation of lost will not shown to have been inaccessible to testator — modern cases, 70 ALR4th 323.

§ 2-6-208.
Order of preference for appointment of executor.

Letters testamentary may be granted to one or more persons found to be qualified. Preference for appointment shall be in the following order:

The person designated in the will;

Any beneficiary named in the will, or a person nominated by the beneficiaries;

Any creditor of the decedent, or a person nominated by such creditor;

Such other person as the court may find to be qualified.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 2-6-209.
Order admitting or disallowing probate; mailing of copies.

The court or the clerk shall enter an order either admitting the will to probate or disallowing probate because of insufficient proof. An order admitting a will to probate shall include the appointment of an executor. The clerk, personal representative or attorney shall transmit by certified mail a copy of the order admitting the will to probate, together with a copy of the will, to each named beneficiary and to each heir of the decedent.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1989, ch 115, § 1.

§ 2-6-210.
Form of letters testamentary.

Letters testamentary must be substantially in the following form:

State of Wyoming County of ss The last will of A. B., deceased, a copy of which is hereto attached, having been proved and recorded in the district court within and for the county of , C. D. is hereby appointed executor. Witness, G. H., clerk of the district court of the district within and for the county of with the seal of the court affixed, the day of A.D. Clerk.

Click to view

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 6, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 4657; C.S. 1910, § 5524; C.S. 1920, § 6797; R.S. 1931, § 88-2101; C.S. 1945, § 6-801; W.S. 1957, § 2-90; W.S. 1977, §

2-5-101

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part I,” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 169 (1972).

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part III,” IX Land & Water L. Rev. 567 (1974).

§ 2-6-211.
Authority of executor not designated in will.

Executors who are not designated in the will have the same authority over the estates which executors named in the will have.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 5, § 8; R.S. 1899, § 4634; C.S. 1910, § 5501; C.S. 1920, § 6774; R.S. 1931, § 88-1608; C.S. 1945, § 6-708; W.S. 1957, § 2-113; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-308; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to appointment of administrator generally, see §

2-4-201

et seq.